Yamls/Pron-kytshom_gt-norm.yaml
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: кытшӧммезӧкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: кытшӧммезӧскӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: кытшӧммезӧлӧнкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: кытшӧммезӧліськӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: кытшӧммезӧлӧкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: кытшӧммезнамкӧ 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧкӧкӧт, кытшӧммезӧкӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧкӧтӧг, кытшӧммезкӧтӧгьям, кытшӧммезтӧгьямкӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧкӧла, кытшӧммезӧлакӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧкӧся, кытшӧммезӧсякӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: кытшӧммезамкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [кытшӧммесимкӧ, кытшӧммезсимкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: кытшӧммезамкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧкӧлань, кытшӧммезӧланькӧ, кытшӧммезкӧланям, кытшӧммезланямкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧкӧсянь, кытшӧммезӧсянькӧ, кытшӧммезкӧсяням, кытшӧммезсянямкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧттямкӧ, кытшӧммезӧттимкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧдззамкӧ, кытшӧммезӧдззимкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧкӧви, кытшӧммезӧвикӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезкӧланям, кытшӧммезланямкӧ, кытшӧммезӧкӧланьын, кытшӧммезӧланьынкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезкӧланьсим, кытшӧммезланьсимкӧ, кытшӧммезӧкӧланись, кытшӧммезӧланиськӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезкӧланям, кытшӧммезланямкӧ, кытшӧммезӧкӧланьӧ, кытшӧммезӧланьӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезкӧланьсяням, кытшӧммезланьсянямкӧ, кытшӧммезӧкӧланьсянь, кытшӧммезӧланьсянькӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезкӧланьӧттям, кытшӧммезкӧланьӧттим, кытшӧммезланьӧттямкӧ, кытшӧммезланьӧттимкӧ, кытшӧммезӧкӧланьӧт, кытшӧммезӧланьӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезкӧланьӧдззам, кытшӧммезкӧланьӧдззим, кытшӧммезланьӧдззамкӧ, кытшӧммезланьӧдззимкӧ, кытшӧммезӧкӧланьӧдз, кытшӧммезӧланьӧдзкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg1: [кытшӧммезӧкӧланьви, кытшӧммезӧланьвикӧ]


    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧ, кытшӧммезыткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметӧкӧ, кытшӧммезтӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметлӧнкӧ, кытшӧммезытлӧнкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметліськӧ, кытшӧммезытліськӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметлӧкӧ, кытшӧммезытлӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: кытшӧммезнаткӧ 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧткӧ, кытшӧммезыткӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧтӧг, кытшӧммезыткӧтӧг, кытшӧммезкӧтӧгьят, кытшӧммезтӧгьяткӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧла, кытшӧммезыткӧла, кытшӧмметлакӧ, кытшӧммезытлакӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧся, кытшӧммезыткӧся, кытшӧмметсякӧ, кытшӧммезытсякӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: кытшӧммезаткӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [кытшӧммеситкӧ, кытшӧммезситкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: кытшӧммезаткӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧлань, кытшӧммезыткӧлань, кытшӧмметланькӧ, кытшӧммезытланькӧ, кытшӧммезкӧланят, кытшӧммезланяткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧсянь, кытшӧммезыткӧсянь, кытшӧмметсянькӧ, кытшӧммезытсянькӧ, кытшӧммезкӧсянят, кытшӧммезсяняткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезӧттяткӧ, кытшӧммезӧттиткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезӧдззаткӧ, кытшӧммезӧдззиткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧви, кытшӧммезыткӧви, кытшӧмметвикӧ, кытшӧммезытвикӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезкӧланят, кытшӧммезланяткӧ, кытшӧмметкӧланьын, кытшӧммезыткӧланьын, кытшӧмметланьынкӧ, кытшӧммезытланьынкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезкӧланьсит, кытшӧммезланьситкӧ, кытшӧмметкӧланись, кытшӧммезыткӧланись, кытшӧмметланиськӧ, кытшӧммезытланиськӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезкӧланят, кытшӧммезланяткӧ, кытшӧмметкӧланьӧ, кытшӧммезыткӧланьӧ, кытшӧмметланьӧкӧ, кытшӧммезытланьӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезкӧланьсянят, кытшӧммезланьсяняткӧ, кытшӧмметкӧланьсянь, кытшӧммезыткӧланьсянь, кытшӧмметланьсянькӧ, кытшӧммезытланьсянькӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезкӧланьӧттят, кытшӧммезкӧланьӧттит, кытшӧммезланьӧттяткӧ, кытшӧммезланьӧттиткӧ, кытшӧмметкӧланьӧт, кытшӧммезыткӧланьӧт, кытшӧмметланьӧткӧ, кытшӧммезытланьӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезкӧланьӧдззат, кытшӧммезкӧланьӧдззит, кытшӧммезланьӧдззаткӧ, кытшӧммезланьӧдззиткӧ, кытшӧмметкӧланьӧдз, кытшӧммезыткӧланьӧдз, кытшӧмметланьӧдзкӧ, кытшӧммезытланьӧдзкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧланьви, кытшӧммезыткӧланьви, кытшӧмметланьвикӧ, кытшӧммезытланьвикӧ]


    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеcкӧ, кытшӧммезыcкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеcӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслӧнкӧ, кытшӧммезыслӧнкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесліськӧ, кытшӧммезысліськӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслӧкӧ, кытшӧммезыслӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: кытшӧммезнаскӧ 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧткӧ, кытшӧммезыскӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧтӧг, кытшӧммезыскӧтӧг, кытшӧммезкӧтӧгьяс, кытшӧммезтӧгьяскӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧла, кытшӧммезыскӧла, кытшӧммеслакӧ, кытшӧммезыслакӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧся, кытшӧммезыскӧся, кытшӧммессякӧ, кытшӧммезыссякӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: кытшӧммезаскӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесискӧ, кытшӧммезсискӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: кытшӧммезаскӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧлань, кытшӧммезыскӧлань, кытшӧммесланькӧ, кытшӧммезысланькӧ, кытшӧммезкӧланяс, кытшӧммезланяскӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧсянь, кытшӧммезыскӧсянь, кытшӧммессянькӧ, кытшӧммезыссянькӧ, кытшӧммезкӧсяняс, кытшӧммезсяняскӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезӧттяскӧ, кытшӧммезӧттискӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезӧдззаскӧ, кытшӧммезӧдззискӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧви, кытшӧммезыскӧви, кытшӧммесвикӧ, кытшӧммезысвикӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезкӧланяс, кытшӧммезланяскӧ, кытшӧммескӧланьын, кытшӧммезыскӧланьын, кытшӧммесланьынкӧ, кытшӧммезысланьынкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезкӧланьсис, кытшӧммезланьсискӧ, кытшӧммескӧланись, кытшӧммезыскӧланись, кытшӧммесланиськӧ, кытшӧммезысланиськӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезкӧланяс, кытшӧммезланяскӧ, кытшӧммескӧланьӧ, кытшӧммезыскӧланьӧ, кытшӧммесланьӧкӧ, кытшӧммезысланьӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезкӧланьсяняс, кытшӧммезланьсяняскӧ, кытшӧммескӧланьсянь, кытшӧммезыскӧланьсянь, кытшӧммесланьсянькӧ, кытшӧммезысланьсянькӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезкӧланьӧттяс, кытшӧммезкӧланьӧттис, кытшӧммезланьӧттяскӧ, кытшӧммезланьӧттискӧ, кытшӧммескӧланьӧт, кытшӧммезыскӧланьӧт, кытшӧммесланьӧткӧ, кытшӧммезысланьӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезкӧланьӧдззас, кытшӧммезкӧланьӧдззис, кытшӧммезланьӧдззаскӧ, кытшӧммезланьӧдззискӧ, кытшӧммескӧланьӧдз, кытшӧммезыскӧланьӧдз, кытшӧммесланьӧдзкӧ, кытшӧммезысланьӧдзкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧланьви, кытшӧммезыскӧланьви, кытшӧммесланьвикӧ, кытшӧммезысланьвикӧ]


    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымӧскӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымлӧнкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымліськӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымлӧкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнанымкӧ 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымкӧткӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымкӧтӧг, кытшӧммезкӧтӧгьяным, кытшӧммезтӧгьянымкӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымкӧла, кытшӧммезнымлакӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымкӧся, кытшӧммезнымсякӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: кытшӧммезанымкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [кытшӧммесинымкӧ, кытшӧммезсинымкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: кытшӧммезанымкӧ
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымкӧлань, кытшӧммезнымланькӧ, кытшӧммезкӧланяным, кытшӧммезланянымкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымкӧсянь, кытшӧммезнымсянькӧ, кытшӧммезкӧсяняным, кытшӧммезсянянымкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезӧттянымкӧ, кытшӧммезӧттинымкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезӧдззанымкӧ, кытшӧммезӧдззинымкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымкӧви, кытшӧммезнымвикӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезкӧланяным, кытшӧммезланянымкӧ, кытшӧммезнымкӧланьын, кытшӧммезнымланьынкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезкӧланьсиным, кытшӧммезланьсинымкӧ, кытшӧммезнымкӧланись, кытшӧммезнымланиськӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезкӧланяным, кытшӧммезланянымкӧ, кытшӧммезнымкӧланьӧ, кытшӧммезнымланьӧкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезкӧланьсяняным, кытшӧммезланьсянянымкӧ, кытшӧммезнымкӧланьсянь, кытшӧммезнымланьсянькӧ] 
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезкӧланьӧттяным, кытшӧммезкӧланьӧттиным, кытшӧммезланьӧттянымкӧ, кытшӧммезланьӧттинымкӧ, кытшӧммезнымкӧланьӧт, кытшӧммезнымланьӧткӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезкӧланьӧдззаным, кытшӧммезкӧланьӧдззиным, кытшӧммезланьӧдззанымкӧ, кытшӧммезланьӧдззинымкӧ, кытшӧммезнымкӧланьӧдз, кытшӧммезнымланьӧдзкӧ]
    кытшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымкӧланьви, кытшӧммезнымланьвикӧ]
